Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 2
STATE COUNCIL ON DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

27-10.5-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that state and local agencies provide a variety of services and supports to persons with developmental disabilities including institutional care, residential, social, and income maintenance services, diagnostic and health-related services, and educational and other programs. Because these services and supports are supported by many diverse agencies and organizations and because congress, through the federal "Developmental Disabilities Services and Facilities Construction Act", and amendments thereto, has called for the establishment of state councils to provide coordination and planning in the field of developmental disabilities, the general assembly declares that there is need to establish a state council on developmental disabilities to be responsible for the coordination of services and supports to the persons with developmental disabilities and to serve as an advocate for such persons. The general assembly further finds that there is need to carefully define the duties and responsibilities of a state council on developmental disabilities.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1117, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1010, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1386, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1024, § 48, effective June 1.

27-10.5-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic disability of a person nine years of age or older which:

Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments;

Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two;

Results in substantial functional limitations in three or more of the following areas of major life activity:

Self-care;

Receptive and expressive language;

Learning;

Mobility;

Self-direction;

Capacity for independent living; and

Economic self-sufficiency; and

Reflects the person's need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services and supports which are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated; except that such term when applied to infants and young children means individuals from birth to age nine years, inclusive, who have substantial developmental delay or specific congenital or acquired conditions with a high probability of resulting in developmental disabilities if services or supports are not provided.

"State plan" means the state plan for developmental disabilities established pursuant to the provisions of section 27-10.5-204 and as required by the federal "Developmental Disabilities Services and Facilities Construction Act", and amendments thereto, including the "Rehabilitation, Comprehensive Services, and Developmental Disabilities Amendments of 1978", Pub.L. 95-602.

"State council" means the Colorado developmental disabilities council established pursuant to section 27-10.5-203.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1117, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1386, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (1)(d), and (3) amended, p. 1025, § 49, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Pub.L. 95-602 is contained in 29 U.S.C. sec. 720.

27-10.5-203. Establishment of state council.

There is created in the office of the executive director of the department of human services the Colorado developmental disabilities council. The state council is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department. The state council shall operate in accordance with the federal "Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000", 42 U.S.C. sec. 15001 et seq.

The state council consists of twenty-four members appointed by the governor for three-year terms; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than eight members' terms expire in the same year. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

The state council must at all times include in its membership representatives of the following:

The principal state agencies, including the state agency that administers funds provided under the federal "Rehabilitation Act of 1973", the state agency that administers funds provided under the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", the state agency that administers funds provided under the federal "Older Americans Act of 1965", and the state agency that administers funds provided under Titles V and XIX of the federal "Social Security Act" for persons with developmental disabilities;

The University Centers for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education, Research, and Service;

Nongovernmental agencies; and

Private nonprofit groups concerned with services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities.

At least four members of the state council must be persons with developmental disabilities.

At least four members of the state council must be family members or guardians of persons with mentally impairing developmental disabilities, who are not employees of a state agency that receives funds or provides services and supports under this part 2, and who are not employees implementing programs under the federal "Social Security Act" or of any other entity that receives funds or provides services and supports under this part 2. At least one individual of the four appointed in this subsection (3)(c) must be an immediate relative or guardian of an institutionalized or previously institutionalized person with a developmental disability.

At least half of the membership of the state council must be individuals described in subsection (3)(b) or (3)(c) of this section, or parents or guardians of such persons with developmental disabilities.

Members of the state council serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for their expenses while attending regular and special meetings of the state council.

The state council shall operate in accordance with bylaws adopted by a quorum of its membership.

For the purposes of holding meetings of the state council, a quorum shall be a simple majority of the state council membership in attendance.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1118, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2) and (6) amended, p. 1010, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1387, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1164, § 138, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), (3), IP(4), IP(5), (6), and (7) amended, p. 1025, § 50, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 69, § 92, effective February 25; (1) amended, (SB22-162), ch. 469, p. 3379, § 77, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by SB 22-013 and SB 22-162 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

(2) For the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", see Pub.L. 91-230, codified at 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq. For the "Older Americans Act of 1965", see Pub.L. 89-73, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 3001 et seq.

(3) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-10.5-204. Development of the state plan.

The state council shall develop a five-year state plan for developmental disabilities in accordance with the federal "Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000", 42 U.S.C. sec. 15024. The state plan shall include establishment of goals and priorities for meeting the needs of persons with developmental disabilities, including recommendations concerning state program operations and funding for a comprehensive system of services and supports to persons with developmental disabilities. The state plan shall be prepared in compliance with federal requirements and shall designate the state agency responsible for administration of the state plan. The state council shall submit the state plan to the governor for approval.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1118, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1389, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1026, § 51, effective June 1.

27-10.5-205. Powers and duties.

The state council shall:

Monitor the plans and programs of state agencies established and administered pursuant to the state plan;

Review budgets and other programs and proposals for funding services and supports to persons with developmental disabilities;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(c) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Review programs that provide services and supports to persons with developmental disabilities under contracts with state agencies and community centered boards as authorized by the state plan;

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(c) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Review programs that provide long-term services and supports to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities under contracts with state agencies and case management agencies as authorized by the state plan;

Encourage cooperation and coordination of services and supports of public and private agencies including home care services and assist in the elimination of unnecessary and duplicative programs and procedures;

Identify gaps in services and supports to persons with developmental disabilities and monitor programs for deinstitutionalization of such persons;

Serve in an advisory capacity to the governor and the general assembly on matters affecting persons with developmental disabilities;

Meet at least quarterly and as often as necessary to fulfill its duties and responsibilities;

Have all powers necessary to carry out the provisions of this part 2.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1118, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), and (1)(f) amended, p. 1011, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1389, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1026, § 52, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 350, § 61, effective July 1, 2024.

27-10.5-206. State council employees.

Subject to available appropriations, the executive director of the department of human services may employ such personnel as are required by the state council, pursuant to the provisions of section 13 of article XII of the state constitution. The executive director of the department of human services will appoint the staff director to the state council, accepting the recommendations of the council.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1119, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1164, § 139, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1026, § 53, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

27-10.5-207. Cooperation of departments.

The departments of human services, public health and environment, and education shall cooperate with the state council in the development of and implementation of the recommendations made within the state plan. Said departments shall provide documents and other assistance requested by the state council or its representatives which are essential for the state council to meet its federal and state statutory requirements.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1119, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1390, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1164, § 140, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1027, § 54, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

27-10.5-208. Service provision system evaluation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1011, § 36, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1988. (See L. 85, p. 1011.)